Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.040

Powers, duties, and functions relating to motor vehicle laws vested in department.

The department is vested with all powers, functions, and duties with respect to and including the following:

(1) The fuel tax and aircraft fuel tax as provided in chapters 82.38 and 82.42 RCW;

(2) The motor vehicle excise tax as provided in chapter 82.44 RCW;

(3) The travel trailers and campers excise tax as provided in chapter 82.50 RCW;

(4) All general powers and duties relating to motor vehicles as provided in chapter 46.08 RCW;

(5) Certificates of title and registration certificates as provided in chapters 46.12 and 46.16A RCW;

(6) The registration of motor vehicles as provided in chapter 46.16A RCW;

(7) Dealers' licenses as provided in chapter 46.70 RCW;

(8) The licensing of motor vehicle transporters as provided in chapter 46.76 RCW;

(9) The licensing of vehicle wreckers as provided in chapter 46.80 RCW;

(10) The administration of the laws relating to reciprocal or proportional registration of motor vehicles as provided in chapter 46.85 RCW;

(11) The licensing of passenger vehicles for hire as provided in chapter 46.72 RCW;

(12) Drivers' licenses as provided in chapter 46.20 RCW;

(13) Commercial driver training schools as provided in chapter 46.82 RCW;

(14) Financial responsibility as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW;

(15) Accident reporting as provided in chapter 46.52 RCW;

(16) Disposition of revenues as provided in chapter 46.68 RCW; and

(17) The administration of all other laws relating to motor vehicles vested in the director of licenses on June 30, 1965.

[ 2013 c 225 s 606; 2011 c 171 s 10; 2010 c 161 s 1108; 1983 c 3 s 117; 1979 c 158 s 115; 1965 c 156 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 225: See note following RCW 82.38.010.

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.